District of Columbia statutes.
8-1317

Annual hazardous waste and toxic chemical reports.

(a)

Within 270 days of March 8, 1991, and annually thereafter, a business shall submit EPA Form R to the Mayor, including Part III #8, pursuant to 40 C.F.R. 372.85, if the business:

(1)

Releases a toxic chemical subject to regulation in accordance with 40 C.F.R. 372;

(2)

Generates hazardous waste subject to regulation in accordance with 40 C.F.R. 261, 262, 263, or 264; or

(3)

Is identified in § 8-1316.

(b)

The Mayor shall require the submission of additional source reduction and recycling data collected in accordance with section 6607 of the Pollution Prevention Act, or other federal legislation or regulations.

(c)

EPA Form R, and any additional data required, shall be signed by a senior-level manager who shall be liable for any inaccuracies contained in the submission.

History

Mar. 16, 1978, D.C. Law 2-64, § 19
as added Mar. 8, 1991, D.C. Law 8-229, title I, § 102(c), 38 DCR 246

Section References

This section is referenced in § 8-1318.

Prior Codifications

1981 Ed., § 6-733.

References in Text

The “Pollution Prevention Act”, referred to in (b), is Pub. L. 101-508, § 6601 et seq., codified at 42 U.S.C. § 13101 et seq. Section 6607 of the Pollution Prevention Act, referred to in (b), is codified at 42 U.S.C. § 13106.